Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7322.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) The Rhode Island department of health (RIDOH) has been awarded a five-year federal
Maternal Health Innovation (MHI) grant by the Health Resources and Services Administration
(HRSA), beginning in late 2023, to improve maternal health outcomes statewide.
(2) Rhode Island continues to experience racial, ethnic, geographic, and socioeconomic
disparities in maternal morbidity and mortality.
(3) The MHI grant establishes and funds the Rhode Island maternal health task force
(RIMHTF) and supports the development of a statewide maternal health strategic plan.
(4) Improving maternal health requires data modernization, strengthened workforce
pipelines including midwives and community birth workers, expanded access to culturally
congruent perinatal care, and alignment with social and environmental determinants of health.
(5) Long-term sustainability is essential. Statewide support must continue beyond the five-
year federal award.
(6) Rhode Island’s maternal health outcomes directly impact long-term family well-being,
early childhood outcomes, and community resilience, particularly in coastal and urban areas
vulnerable to environmental stressors.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby

amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 13.9
THE RHODE ISLAND MATERNAL HEALTH IMPROVEMENT AND EQUITY ACT OF
2026
23-13.9-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Rhode Island Maternal Health
Improvement and Equity Act of 2026".
23-13.9-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Department” means the Rhode Island department of health.
(2) “Director” means the director of the Rhode Island department of health.
(3) “Maternal health workforce” includes certified nurse-midwives, certified professional
midwives, doulas, perinatal community health workers, lactation consultants, and culturally
concordant birth workers.
(4) "MHI" means the five (5) year federal Maternal Health Innovation grant by the Health
Resources and Service Administration ("HRSA") awarded to the Rhode Island department of health
(DOH) beginning in 2023.
(5) “Strategic plan” means the Rhode Island maternal health strategic plan produced under
the federal grant.
(6) “Task force” means the Rhode Island maternal health task force established by the
department of health under the Health Resources and Services Administration Maternal Health
Innovation grant.
23-13.9-3. Creation and duties of advisory board.
(a) The Rhode Island maternal health advisory board ("advisory board") is hereby created
and established to perform the duties and exercise the powers set forth in this section. Pursuant to
the powers delegated to the department, the department shall have the responsibility for
supervising, organizing, and evaluating the advisory board. The advisory board shall consult with
the task force to carry out its duties pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.
(b) The advisory board shall consist of seven (7) members. Three (3) members shall be
appointed by the governor; two (2) members shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and
two (2) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. Due
consideration shall be given to appointing persons with expertise and experience in the maternal
health workforce.
(c) The members of the advisory board shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years;
LC003215 - Page 2 of 6

provided, however, with regard to the initial appointments, three (3) members shall be appointed
for a term of one year; two (2) members shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and two (2)
members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. Members may be reappointed, and their
appointment shall continue until their successors shall be appointed. A vacancy, other than by
expiration, shall be filled in the manner of the original appointment, but only for the unexpired
portion of the term.
(d) The members of the advisory board shall receive no compensation.
(e) The governor shall appoint a chairperson; a vice-chairperson and secretary shall be
elected annually by the advisory board members. All officers of the advisory board shall serve until
their successors have been duly appointed or elected.
(f) The advisory board shall meet at least quarterly or at the call of the chairperson of the
advisory board. The chairperson of the advisory board, or designee, shall be present for all advisory
board meetings.
(g) The advisory board shall have the following purposes and duties:
(1) Oversee the implementation of the maternal health strategic plan;
(2) Make recommendations as to improvements in maternal care access and outcomes;
(3) Review statewide maternal data and disparities;
(4) Advise the department in developing and maintaining the maternal health data and
surveillance unit pursuant to § 23-13.9-4;
(5) Advise the department in establishing a maternal health workforce development
program pursuant to § 23-13.9-5;
(6) Advise the department in awarding competitive community maternal health access
grants pursuant to § 23-13.9-6; and
(7) Report annually to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the director commencing July 1, 2027, and July 1 annually thereafter.
(h) The advisory board shall continue beyond the expiration of the federal MHI grant and
report annually by July 1, commencing July 1, 2027, to the governor, the president of the senate,
the speaker of the house of representatives, and the director on the progress of MHI grant
objectives; funding necessary to sustain programs upon the expiration of the grant; and
recommendations to ensure statewide supports become permanent.
(i) In addition to sums of money received from the federal government and in addition to
appropriations made by the general assembly, the department may accept in the name of and on
behalf of the state gifts of money, other than federal and state government allotments or
appropriations, which shall be construed as gifts and shall be deposited by the general treasurer in
LC003215 - Page 3 of 6

an account or accounts of the department that the director may designate. The provisions of § 35-
4-1 shall not apply to this subsection, insofar as they relate to the disposal of money received as
gifts.
23-13.9-4. Maternal health data modernization.
(a) The department shall develop and maintain a maternal health data and surveillance unit
responsible for:
(1) Monitoring maternal morbidity and mortality across prenatal, perinatal, and postpartum
periods;
(2) Integrating data on social and environmental determinants, including housing stability,
transportation access, exposure to extreme heat or flooding, and neighborhood disadvantage;
(3) Commencing July 1, 2027, and July 1 annually thereafter, provide a Rhode Island
maternal health outcomes report to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the
house of representatives, and the director; and
(4) Supporting data requirements of the federal MHI grant.
(b) The department is authorized to:
(1) Contract with academic, clinical, or community partners;
(2) Collect data from licensed maternity care providers, hospitals, and community birth
workers.
23-13.9-5. Maternal health workforce development program.
(a) The department shall establish a maternal health workforce development program to:
(1) Expand training pathways for midwives, community birth workers, and doulas;
(2) Support bilingual and culturally concordant workforce pipelines;
(3) Provide scholarships, stipends, or loan repayment for trainees who commit to serving
in maternal health shortage areas; and
(4) Partner with Rhode Island colleges, universities, and community-based organizations.
(b) Priority shall be given to workforce expansion in:
(1) Aquidneck Island and Newport county;
(2) Urban core communities; and
(3) Medically underserved coastal areas.
(c) The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of
this section.
23-13.9-6. Community-based maternal health access grants.
(a) The department shall award competitive community maternal health access grants to
expand local supports including:
LC003215 - Page 4 of 6

(1) Prenatal navigation services;
(2) Doula and community birth worker programs;
(3) Local transportation assistance for maternal medical appointments; and
(4) Programs addressing postpartum mental health, breastfeeding support, and home-
visiting services.
(b) Eligible entities include community-based nonprofits, health centers, tribal nations,
hospitals, and municipalities.
23-13.9-7. Budget.
Beginning FY 2029, the department shall submit a maternal health sustainability plan in
its budget request.
23-13.9-8. Appropriations.
(a) Beginning FY 2026, and annually thereafter, there is hereby appropriated, out of any
money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated for the fiscal year 2026-2027, the sum of two
million seven hundred thousand dollars ($2,700,000). The monies shall be appropriated as follows:
(1) Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) for the maternal health data and
surveillance unit established pursuant to § 23-13.9-4;
(2) One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) for the workplace development
program established pursuant to § 23-13.9-5;
(3) Six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) for community maternal health access grants
established pursuant to § 23-13.9- 6; and
(4) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for advisory council operations,
community engagement and reporting.
(b) The amounts appropriated pursuant to this section shall supplement the federal MHI
funds and are not intended to supplant federal MHI funds.
23-13.9-9. Regulations.
The department shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the
provisions of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003215
========
LC003215 - Page 5 of 6